Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.080

Delivery of books and papers—Enforcement of order.

If the defendant shall refuse or neglect to deliver over the books and papers pursuant to the order, the court or judge thereof shall enforce the order by attachment and imprisonment.

[Code 1881 s 709; 1877 p 144 s 713; 1854 p 217 s 475; RRS s 1041.]